Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-907
Commission; adopt rules and regulations.

The commission may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Grain Dealer Act.

Laws 1985, LB 389, § 9;

Laws 1987, LB 507, § 5.